California statutes. Penal Code
(a) For all firearms, the register or record of electronic transfer shall include all of the following information:

(1) The date and time of sale.

(2) The make of firearm.

(3) Peace officer exemption status pursuant to the provisions listed in subdivision (c) of Section 16585, and the agency name.

(4) Any applicable waiting period exemption information.

(5) California Firearms Dealer number issued pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) of Chapter 2.

(6) The purchaser’s firearm safety certificate number issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 31610) of Chapter 4 of Division 10 of this title.

(7) Manufacturer’s name if stamped on the firearm.

(8) Model name or number, if stamped on the firearm.

(9) Serial number, if applicable.

(10) Other number, if more than one serial number is stamped on the firearm.

(11) Any identification number or mark assigned to the firearm pursuant to Section 23910.

(12) If the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or mark
 assigned to it, a notation as to that fact.

(13) Caliber.

(14) Type of firearm.

(15) If the firearm is new or used.

(16) Barrel length.

(17) Color of the firearm.

(18) Full name of purchaser.

(19) Purchaser’s complete date of birth.

(20) Purchaser’s local address.

(21) If current address is temporary, complete permanent address of purchaser.

(22) For transactions on and
 after September 1, 2025, purchaser’s email address.

(23) Identification of purchaser.

(24) Purchaser’s place of birth (state or country).

(25) Purchaser’s complete telephone number.

(26) Purchaser’s occupation.

(27) Purchaser’s gender.

(28) Purchaser’s physical description.

(29) All legal names and aliases ever used by the purchaser.

(30) Yes or no answer to questions that prohibit purchase, including, but not limited to, conviction of a felony as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section
 29800) or an offense described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9, the purchaser’s status as a person described in Section 8100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, whether the purchaser is a person who has been adjudicated by a court to be a danger to others or found not guilty by reason of insanity, and whether the purchaser is a person who has been found incompetent to stand trial or placed under conservatorship by a court pursuant to Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(31) Yes or no answer to a question that inquires whether the purchaser has, within the past 30 days, checked and confirmed possession of all firearms currently owned or possessed.

(32) Signature of purchaser.

(33) Signature of salesperson, as a witness to the purchaser’s signature.

(34) Salesperson’s certificate of eligibility number, if the salesperson has obtained a certificate of eligibility.

(35) Name and complete address of the dealer or firm selling the firearm as shown on the dealer’s license.

(36) The establishment number, if assigned.

(37) The dealer’s complete business telephone number.

(38) Any information required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(39) Any information required to determine whether subdivision (f) of Section 27540 applies.

(40) A statement of the penalties for signing a fictitious name or address,
 knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the register.

(41) A statement informing the purchaser, after taking ownership of a firearm, of all of the following:

(A) Upon application, the Department of Justice shall furnish to the purchaser any information reported to the department as it relates to their ownership of that firearm.

(B) The purchaser is entitled to file a report of their acquisition, disposition, or ownership of a firearm with the department pursuant to Section 28000.

(C) Instructions for accessing the department’s internet website for more information.

(42) For transactions on and after January 1, 2015,
 the purchaser’s firearm safety certificate number, except that in the case of a handgun, the number from an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(b) The purchaser shall provide the purchaser’s right thumbprint on the register in a manner prescribed by the department. No exception to this requirement shall be permitted except by regulations adopted by the department.

(c) The firearms dealer shall record on the register or record of electronic transfer the date that the firearm is delivered, together with the firearm dealer’s signature indicating delivery of the firearm.

(d) The purchaser shall sign the register or the record of electronic transfer on the date that the firearm is delivered to them.

(e) This section shall become operative on
 March 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4.5 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 245) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 237, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative March 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

28170.

Where the register is used, the following shall apply:

(a) Dealers shall use ink to complete each document.

(b) The dealer or salesperson making a sale shall ensure that all information is provided legibly. The dealer and salespersons shall be informed that incomplete or illegible information will delay sales.

(c) Each dealer shall be provided instructions regarding the procedure for completion of the form and routing of the form. Dealers shall comply with these instructions, which shall include the information set forth in this section.

(d) One firearm
 transaction shall be reported on each record of sale document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 51.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

28175.

The dealer or salesperson making a sale shall ensure that all required information has been obtained from the purchaser. The dealer and all salespersons shall be informed that incomplete information will delay sales.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28180.

(a) The purchaser’s name, date of birth, and driver’s license or identification number shall be obtained electronically from the magnetic strip on the purchaser’s driver’s license or identification and shall not be supplied by any other means, except as authorized by the department.

(b) The requirement of subdivision (a) shall not apply in either of the following cases:

(1) The purchaser’s identification consists of a military identification card.

(2) Due to technical limitations, the magnetic strip reader is unable to obtain the required information from the purchaser’s identification. In those
 circumstances, the firearms dealer shall obtain a photocopy of the identification as proof of compliance.

(c) In the event that the dealer has reported to the department that the dealer’s equipment has failed, information pursuant to this section shall be obtained by an alternative method to be determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 52.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Submission of Fees and Firearm Purchaser Information to the Department of Justice [28200. - 28255.]

28200.

As used in this article, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Purchase” means the purchase, loan, or transfer of a firearm.

(b) “Purchaser” means the purchaser or transferee of a firearm or the person being loaned a firearm.

(c) “Sale” means the sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm.

(d) “Seller” means, if the transaction is being conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), the person selling, loaning, or transferring the firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28205.

(a) Until January 1, 1998, the Department of Justice shall determine the method by which a dealer shall submit firearm purchaser information to the department. The information shall be in one of the following formats:

(1) Submission of the register described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150).

(2) Electronic or telephonic transfer of the information contained in the register described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150).

(b) On or after January 1, 1998, electronic or telephonic transfer, including voice or facsimile transmission, shall be the
 exclusive means by which purchaser information is transmitted to the department.

(c) On or after January 1, 2003, except as permitted by the department, electronic transfer shall be the exclusive means by which information is transmitted to the department. Telephonic transfer shall not be permitted for information regarding sales of any firearms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28210.

(a) (1) Where the register is used, the purchaser of any firearm shall be required to present to the dealer clear evidence of the person’s identity and age.

(2) The dealer shall require the purchaser to sign the purchaser’s current legal name and affix the purchaser’s residence address and date of birth to the register in quadruplicate.

(3) For the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person under 21 years of age pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27510, the salesperson shall visually inspect the hunting license to confirm that it is valid and unexpired and shall record the document number, GO ID, and
 dates valid.

(4) The salesperson shall sign the register in quadruplicate, as a witness to the signature and identification of the purchaser.

(b) Any person furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the register shall be punished as provided in Section 28250.

(c) (1) The original of the register shall be retained by the dealer in consecutive order.

(2) Each book of 50 originals shall become the permanent register of transactions, which shall be retained for not less than three years from the date of the last transaction.

(3) Upon presentation of proper identification, the permanent register of transactions shall be available for inspection by any peace officer, Department of Justice employee designated by the Attorney General, or agent of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. Until January 1, 2014, no information shall be compiled therefrom regarding the purchasers or other transferees of firearms that are not handguns.

(d) On the date of the application to purchase, two copies of the original sheet of the register shall be placed in the mail, postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the Department of Justice.

(e) (1) A photocopy of the register shall be provided to the purchaser by the dealer
 at the time of delivery of the firearm and after the dealer notes the date of delivery and the dealer’s signature indicating delivery of the firearm, and the purchaser acknowledges the receipt of the firearm.

(2) The requirements of this subdivision apply if a dealer is delivering a firearm pursuant to Section 27540 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(f) If the transaction is a private party transfer conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), a photocopy of the original shall be provided to the seller by the dealer at the time the register is signed by the seller. The dealer shall redact all of the purchaser’s personal information, as required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 28160 and subdivision (a) of Section 28165, from the seller’s
 copy, and the seller’s personal information from the purchaser’s copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 16.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

28215.

(a) (1) Where the electronic or telephonic transfer of applicant information is used, the purchaser shall be required to present to the dealer clear evidence of the person’s identity and age.

(2) The dealer shall require the purchaser to sign the purchaser’s current legal name to the record of electronic or telephonic transfer.

(3) The salesperson shall sign the record of electronic or telephonic transfer, as a witness to the signature and identification of the purchaser.

(4) For the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person under 21
 years of age pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27510, the salesperson shall visually inspect the hunting license to confirm that it is valid and unexpired and shall record the document number, GO ID, and dates valid.

(5) For the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person under 21 years of age pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27510, or to a person without a valid firearm safety certificate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 31700, if the dealer or salesperson, upon visual inspection of the hunting license, is unable to confirm that it is valid and unexpired, they shall not deliver the firearm.

(b) Any person furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be
 provided for the electronic or telephonic transfer shall be punished as provided in Section 28250.

(c) (1) The original of each record of electronic or telephonic transfer shall be retained by the dealer in consecutive order.

(2) Each original shall become the permanent record of the transaction, which shall be retained for not less than three years from the date of the last transaction.

(3) Upon presentation of proper identification, the permanent record of the transaction shall be provided for inspection by any peace officer, Department of Justice employee designated by the Attorney General, or agent of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.

(d) On the date of the application to purchase, the record of applicant information shall be transmitted to the Department of Justice by electronic or telephonic transfer.

(e) (1) A copy of the record of electronic or telephonic transfer shall be provided to the purchaser by the dealer at the time of delivery of the firearm and after the dealer notes the date of delivery and the dealer’s signature indicating delivery of the firearm, and the purchaser acknowledges the receipt of the firearm.

(2) The requirements of this subdivision apply if a dealer is delivering a firearm pursuant to Section 27540 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(f) If the transaction is a private party transfer conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), a copy shall be provided to the seller by the dealer at the time the record of electronic or telephonic transfer is signed by the seller. The dealer shall redact all of the purchaser’s personal information, as required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 28160 and subdivision (a) of Section 28165, from the seller’s copy, and the seller’s personal information from the purchaser’s copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 17.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

28220.

(a) (1) Upon submission of firearm purchaser information, the Department of Justice shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in order to determine if the purchaser is a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, or is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2025, for the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person under 21 years of age pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27510, the Department of Justice shall verify the validity
 of the purchaser’s hunting license with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(b) The Department of Justice shall participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS), as described in subsection (t) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code, and shall notify the dealer and the chief of the police department of the city or city and county in which the sale was made, or if the sale was made in a district in which there is no municipal police department, the sheriff of the county in which the sale was made, that the purchaser is a person prohibited from acquiring a firearm under federal law.

(c) If the department determines that the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm or is a
 person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, it shall do both of the following:

(1) Immediately notify the dealer and the chief of the police department of the city or city and county in which the sale was made, or if the sale was made in a district in which there is no municipal police department, the sheriff of the county in which the sale was made, of that fact.

(2) Notify the purchaser and explain the process by which the purchaser may obtain a copy of the criminal or mental health record the department has on file for the purchaser. Upon receipt of that criminal or mental health record, the purchaser may report any inaccuracies or incompleteness to the department on an approved form.

(d) If the
 firearm matches an entry in the registry described in Section 11106 indicating the firearm is stolen, the department shall immediately do all of the following:

(1) Reject the purchase.

(2) Notify the dealer that the firearm matches an entry in the registry described in Section 11106 indicating the firearm is stolen and that the dealer shall retain the firearm until a law enforcement agency is able to retrieve the firearm.

(3) Notify the law enforcement agency that made the stolen entry that the firearm has been located. The reporting agency shall retrieve the firearm from the dealer and report the firearm’s recovery pursuant to Sections 11108.2, 11108.3, and 11108.5. A reporting agency may comply with this section by arranging
 to have another state or local law enforcement agency retrieve the firearm on their behalf.

(e) If the department determines that the copies of the register submitted to it pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 28210 contain any blank spaces or inaccurate, illegible, or incomplete information, preventing identification of the purchaser or the handgun or other firearm to be purchased, or if any fee required pursuant to Section 28225 is not submitted by the dealer in conjunction with submission of copies of the register, the department may notify the dealer of that fact. Upon notification by the department, the dealer shall submit corrected copies of the register to the department, or shall submit any fee required pursuant to Section 28225, or both, as appropriate and, if notification by the department is received by the dealer at any
 time prior to delivery of the firearm to be purchased, the dealer shall withhold delivery until the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(f) If the department determines that the information transmitted to it pursuant to Section 28215 contains inaccurate or incomplete information preventing identification of the purchaser or the handgun or other firearm to be purchased, or if the fee required pursuant to Section 28225 is not transmitted by the dealer in conjunction with transmission of the electronic or telephonic record, the department may notify the dealer of that fact. Upon notification by the department, the dealer shall transmit corrections to the record of electronic or telephonic transfer to the department, or shall transmit any fee required pursuant to Section 28225, or both, as
 appropriate, and if notification by the department is received by the dealer at any time prior to delivery of the firearm to be purchased, the dealer shall withhold delivery until the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(g) (1) The department shall immediately notify the dealer to delay the transfer of the firearm to the purchaser if the records of the department, or the records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, indicate one of the following:

(A) The purchaser has been taken into custody and placed in a facility for mental health treatment or evaluation and may be a person described in Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the department is unable to
 ascertain whether the purchaser is a person who is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, pursuant to Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, prior to the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(B) The purchaser has been arrested for, or charged with, a crime that would make the purchaser, if convicted, a person who is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, and the department is unable to ascertain whether the purchaser was convicted of that offense prior
 to the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(C) The purchaser may be a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, and the department is unable to ascertain whether the purchaser, in fact, is a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, prior to the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(D) The purchaser may be prohibited from possessing, receiving,
 owning, or purchasing a firearm, and the purchaser’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm cannot be ascertained without further research regarding the effect of past criminal convictions or mental health confinements on the purchaser’s eligibility, or without obtaining additional records that could not be obtained prior to the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(2) The department shall notify the purchaser by mail or by other means as determined by the department regarding the delay. This paragraph does not apply to any delivery that has been delayed pursuant to paragraph (6).

(3) If the department is able to ascertain the purchaser’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm, for any of
 the reasons described in paragraph (1), after the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, but within 30 days of the dealer’s original submission of the purchaser information to the department pursuant to this section, the department shall do the following:

(A) If the purchaser is not a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, and is not prohibited by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, the department shall immediately notify the dealer of that fact and the dealer may then immediately transfer the firearm to the purchaser, upon the dealer’s recording on the register or record of electronic transfer the date that the firearm is transferred, the dealer signing the register or record
 of electronic transfer indicating delivery of the firearm to that purchaser, and the purchaser signing the register or record of electronic transfer acknowledging the receipt of the firearm on the date that the firearm is delivered to the purchaser.

(B) If the purchaser is a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 27535, or is prohibited by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, the department shall immediately notify the dealer and the chief of the police department in the city or city and county in which the sale was made, or if the sale was made in a district in which there is no municipal police department, the sheriff of the county in which the sale was made, of that fact in compliance with
 subdivision (c).

(4) If the department is unable to ascertain the purchaser’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm for any of the reasons described in paragraph (1), within 30 days of the dealer’s original submission of purchaser information to the department pursuant to this section, the department shall immediately do both of the following:

(A) Notify the dealer and the dealer may then immediately transfer the firearm to the purchaser, upon the dealer’s recording on the register or record of electronic transfer the date that the firearm is transferred, the dealer signing the register or record of electronic transfer indicating delivery of the firearm to that purchaser, and the purchaser signing the register or record of electronic transfer acknowledging
 the receipt of the firearm on the date that the firearm is delivered to the purchaser.

(B) Notify the purchaser of the department’s inability to ascertain the purchaser’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm and explain the process by which the purchaser may obtain a copy of the criminal or mental health record the department has on file for the purchaser. Upon receipt of that criminal or mental health record, the purchaser may report any inaccuracies or incompleteness to the department on an approved form.

(5) Commencing July 1, 2025, if the department is unable to ascertain the validity of a hunting license required pursuant to Section 27510, the department shall immediately notify the dealer to cancel the sale of the firearm. The department shall notify
 the purchaser by mail or by other means as determined by the department, that the hunting license was not valid and unexpired or the Department of Fish and Wildlife was unable to verify the license based upon the information provided.

(6) If, as determined by order of the Attorney General, an emergency of the type described in Section 8558 of the Government Code has caused the department to be unable to obtain or review records to determine a purchaser’s eligibility to purchase, receive, own, or possess a firearm prior to the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, the department may notify the dealer to delay the transfer of the firearm to the purchaser up to 30 days after the dealer’s original submission of purchaser information to the department.

(h) (1) Upon receipt of information demonstrating that a person is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to federal or state law, the department shall submit the name, date of birth, and physical description of the person to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System Index, Denied Persons Files. The information provided shall remain privileged and confidential, and shall not be disclosed, except for the purpose of enforcing federal or state firearms laws.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit the department from sharing information pertaining to a person that is prohibited from possessing a firearm if the department is otherwise expressly authorized or required by state law to share that information with the recipient party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 108.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

28225.

(a) The Department of Justice may require the dealer to charge each firearm purchaser a fee not to exceed one dollar ($1), except that the fee may be increased at a rate not to exceed any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) The fee under subdivision (a) shall be no more than is necessary to fund the following:

(1) The department for the cost of
 furnishing this information.

(2) The department for the cost of meeting its obligations under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) Local mental health facilities for state-mandated local costs resulting from the reporting requirements imposed by Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) The State Department of State Hospitals for the costs resulting from the requirements imposed by Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(5) Local mental hospitals, sanitariums, and institutions for state-mandated local costs resulting from the reporting requirements imposed by Section 8105 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) Local law enforcement agencies for state-mandated local costs resulting from the notification requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 6385 of the Family Code.

(7) Local law enforcement agencies for state-mandated local costs resulting from the notification requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 8105 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(8) For the actual costs associated with the electronic or telephonic transfer of information pursuant to Section 28215.

(9) The Department of Food and Agriculture for the costs resulting from the notification provisions set forth in Section 5343.5 of the
 Food and Agricultural Code.

(10) The department for the costs associated with subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 27560.

(c) The fee established pursuant to this section shall not exceed the sum of the actual processing costs of the department, the estimated reasonable costs of the local mental health facilities for complying with the reporting requirements imposed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the costs of the State Department of State Hospitals for complying with the requirements imposed by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the estimated reasonable costs of local mental hospitals, sanitariums, and institutions for complying with the reporting requirements imposed by paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), the estimated reasonable costs of local law enforcement agencies
 for complying with the notification requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 6385 of the Family Code, the estimated reasonable costs of local law enforcement agencies for complying with the notification requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 8105 of the Welfare and Institutions Code imposed by paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), the estimated reasonable costs of the Department of Food and Agriculture for the costs resulting from the notification provisions set forth in Section 5343.5 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and the estimated reasonable costs of the department for the costs associated with subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 27560.

(d) Where the electronic or telephonic transfer of applicant information is used, the department shall establish a system to be used for the submission of the fees described in
 this section to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 13.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

28230.

(a) The Department of Justice may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse it for each of the following but not to exceed fourteen dollars ($14), except that the fee may be increased at a rate not to exceed any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations:

(1) For the actual costs associated with the preparation, sale, processing, and filing of forms or reports required or utilized pursuant to any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585.

(2) For the actual costs associated with the preparation, sale, processing, and filing of reports utilized pursuant to Sections 26556, 26905, and 28050, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e)
 of Section 32000.

(3) For the actual costs associated with the electronic or telephonic transfer of information pursuant to Section 28215.

(b) Any costs incurred by the Department of Justice to implement this section shall be reimbursed from fees collected and charged pursuant to this section. No fees shall be charged to the dealer pursuant to Section 28225 for implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 159.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

28233.

(a) The Department of Justice may, in addition to the fee described in Sections 28225 and 28230, require a dealer to charge each firearm purchaser a fee in the amount of thirty-one dollars and nineteen cents ($31.19).

(b) Moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Supplemental Subaccount, within the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund, which is hereby created, to be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the department to offset the reasonable costs of firearms-related regulatory and enforcement activities related to the sale, purchase, manufacturing, lawful or unlawful possession, loan, or transfer of firearms pursuant to any provision listed in Section 16580.

(c) The fee described in subdivision (a) may be increased at a rate no more than any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations, but not to exceed the reasonable cost of regulation to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 14.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

28235.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 28233, moneys received by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund, which is hereby created, to be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the department to offset the costs incurred pursuant to any of the following:

(a) This article.

(b) Section 18910.

(c) Section 27555.

(d) Subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 27560.

(e) Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 28010).

(f) Article 6 (commencing with Section 28450).

(g) Section 31110.

(h) Section 31115.

(i) Subdivision (a) of Section 32020.

(j) Section 32670.

(k) Section 33320.

(l) Section 33700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

28240.

Except as otherwise specified, each fee prescribed in this article shall only be charged once for a single transaction on the same date for taking title or possession of any number of firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 14.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

28245.

Whenever the Department of Justice acts pursuant to this article as it pertains to firearms other than handguns, the department’s acts or omissions shall be deemed to be discretionary within the meaning of the Government Claims Act pursuant to Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 759, Sec. 8.   (AB 2690)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

28250.

(a) Any person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Furnishing a fictitious name or address for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under Section 28215.

(2) Knowingly furnishing any incorrect information for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under Section 28215.

(3) Knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under Section 28215.

(4) Violating any provision of this article.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who is prohibited from obtaining a firearm pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who does any of the following shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a term of 8, 12, or 18 months:

(1) Knowingly furnishes a fictitious name or address for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under Section 28215.

(2) Knowingly furnishes any incorrect information for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under
 Section 28215.

(3) Knowingly omits any information required to be provided for the register under Section 28210 or the electronic or telephonic transfer under Section 28215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 546.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

28255.

Commencing January 1, 2014, if after the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, the individual named in the application as the purchaser of the firearm takes possession of the firearm set forth in the application to purchase, the dealer shall notify the Department of Justice of that fact in a manner and within a time period specified by the department, and with sufficient information to identify the purchaser and the firearm that the purchaser took possession of.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 737, Sec. 9.   (AB 500)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund [28300. - 28300.]

28300.

(a) The Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury and shall be administered by the Department of Justice.

(b) The Department of Justice may require firearms dealers to charge each person who obtains a firearm a fee not to exceed five dollars ($5) for each transaction, except that the fee may be increased at a rate not to exceed any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations, and not to exceed the reasonable cost of regulation to the department. Revenues from this fee shall be deposited in the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund.

(c) Revenue deposited into the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund shall be available for expenditure by the Department of Justice upon appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose of implementing and enforcing the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 31610) of Chapter 4 of Division 10, enforcing Section 830.95, Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, Sections 16000 to 16960, inclusive, Sections 16970 to 17230, inclusive, Sections 17240 to 21390, inclusive, and Sections 21590 to 34370, inclusive, and for the establishment, maintenance, and upgrading of equipment and services necessary for firearms dealers to comply with Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 38.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [28400. - 28415.]

28400.
